Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.075

Venue.

An action for a protection order should be filed in the county where the petitioner resides. The petitioner may also file in:

(1) The county where an act giving rise to the petition for a protection order occurred;

(2) The county where a child to be protected by the order primarily resides;

(3) The county where the petitioner resided prior to relocating if relocation was due to the respondent's conduct; or

(4) The court nearest to the petitioner's residence or former residence under subsection (3) of this section.

[ 2022 c 268 s 4; 2021 c 215 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2022 c 268: See note following RCW 7.105.010.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.